Utah statutes.
70A-1a-105.   Severability.

If any provision or clause of this title or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 2007 General Session

